Georgia, session 2025_26, HB166.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF GEORGIA:
SECTION 1.
The General Assembly finds that:
(1) Making sugarcane syrup has been a part of family farm tradition for generations,
particularly in Georgia;
(2) The increase in production costs, competition from artificial syrups, and the decreasing
number of farmers who still make sugarcane syrup, however, has led some to refer to the
making of sugarcane syrup as a dying art;
(3) Establishing a "National Sugarcane Syrup Day" in Georgia would help to preserve the
art of making sugarcane syrup by honoring those who continue with this long-standing
family farm tradition and by raising public awareness of the differences between natural
sugarcane syrup and artificial syrups;
H. B. 166
- 1 -

LC 39 4530
(4) Designating the fourth Friday in November of each year, the day after Thanksgiving,
as "National Sugarcane Syrup Day" is particularly fitting, as it is not only a time when
families gather and celebrate together, but also a time when some say sugarcane is at its
sweetest in Georgia; and
(5) It is, therefore, abundantly fitting and proper that the State of Georgia appropriately
recognize and honor the family farm tradition of making sugarcane syrup by designating
the fourth Friday in November of each year as "National Sugarcane Syrup Day" in Georgia.
SECTION 2.
Chapter 4 of Title 1 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated, relating to holidays and
observances, is amended by adding a new Code section to read as follows:
"1-4-27.
The fourth Friday in November of each year is designated as 'National Sugarcane Syrup
Day' in Georgia."
SECTION 3.
All laws and parts of laws in conflict with this Act are repealed.
H. B. 166
- 2 -